Washington statutes.
RCW 44.90.030

Office of state legislative labor relations—Director.

(1) The office of state legislative labor relations is created to assist the house of representatives, the senate, and legislative agencies in implementing and managing the process of collective bargaining for employees of the legislative branch of state government.

(2)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall employ a director of the office. The director serves at the pleasure of the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives, who shall fix the director's salary.

(b) The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall, before employing a director, consult with legislative employees, the senate facilities and operations committee, the house executive rules committee, and the human resources officers of the house of representatives, the senate, and legislative agencies.

(c) The director serves as the executive and administrative head of the office and may employ additional employees to assist in carrying out the duties of the office. The duties of the office include, but are not limited to, establishing bargaining teams and conducting negotiations on behalf of the employer.

[ 2024 c 333 s 3; 2022 c 283 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 333: See note following RCW 44.90.025.